Alabama, session 2026rs, HB102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-6-130, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-130
(a) Any veteran, as defined in Section 31-5-1, who is a
resident of this state and who is suffering a physical
disability which that requires that any motor vehicle he or
she operates be equipped with special mechanical control
devices or whose physical disability exceeds 50 percent, upon
application accompanied by proof of eligibility to the judge
of probate of the county for the special license plates
provided herein, as may be prescribed by the State Department
of Revenue, and upon payment of five dollars ($5), unless
exempted from the payment of such the fee by law, shall be
Page 1

exempted from the payment of such the fee by law, shall be
HB102 Engrossed
issued license plates, by the judge of probate as provided by
law, for private or pleasure motor vehicles, upon which, in.
In lieu of the number now prescribed by law shall be inscribed
in legible letters the words, "Disabled Veteran," and shall
designate the branch of service and an identifying number as
prescribed by the State Department of Revenue shall be
designated. The plates shall not be transferable. The fee
established by this section shall be in lieu of the regular
license fee now required for motor vehicles and shall be used
to defray the cost of issuing the distinctive license plates.
(b) In lieu of applying the registration fee of five
dollars ($5) to the disabled veteran license plate category
provided for in subsection (a), the registration fee may be
applied to any license plate category in which the disabled
veteran qualifies to obtain a license plate. Any additional
fee required for a plate from a distinctive or personalized
license plate category shall still be required in order to
obtain the plate.
(c)(1) There is established a "Disabled Veteran Spouse"
license plate to be issued to a surviving spouse of a
"Disabled Veteran" license plate recipient pursuant to this
subsection.
(2) The surviving spouse of a deceased "Disabled
Veteran" license plate recipient shall be issued a new
"Disabled Veteran Spouse" license plate for one private motor
vehicle owned by the surviving spouse for the remainder of the
spouse's lifetime or until the spouse's remarriage, upon:
a. Returning the "Disabled Veteran" license plate to
Page 2

a. Returning the "Disabled Veteran" license plate to
HB102 Engrossed
the judge of probate or other issuing official;
b. Providing proof of marriage to the disabled veteran;
and
c. Paying an issuance fee of five dollars ($5) in lieu
of all other regular fees for license plates.
(3) This subsection shall not be construed to permit a
"Disabled Veteran Spouse" license plate recipient to park in
any parking zone designated reserved for handicapped
individuals with disabilities."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2027.
Page 3

1, 2027.
HB102 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Public Safety and
Homeland Security

Read for the second time and placed ................21-Jan-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................11-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 103
Nays 0
Abstains 2


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 4